Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 7 Change of Venue

Cross references. —

See also Rule 40.1, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law §§ 517 to 543; 77 Am. Jur. 2d Venue §§ 50 to 97.

92A C.J.S. Venue §§ 127 to 316.

§ 1-7-101.
Liability for expenses in civil actions.

When a change of venue
is directed in a civil action in the district court, the county from
which the change of venue is taken shall be liable to pay to the county
to which the change is taken the fees paid to the jury trying the
case and any of the regular panel not engaged in the trial but held
in waiting as an incident thereto, allowance to bailiffs, and all
other jury expenses necessarily incurred by such county because of
the change of venue. Such expenses shall be audited and allowed by
the court to which the action is changed and the court shall certify
such allowance to the county clerk of the county from which the change
of venue was first taken. The allowance shall be paid by the county
from which the change of venue was first taken.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 29, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5143; C.S. 1920, § 6420; R.S. 1931, § 89-1103; C.S. 1945, § 3-1903; W.S. 1957, § 1-55; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to venue generally, see §§

1-5-101

to

1-5-109

.

As to fees of jurors, see §§

1-11-301

to

1-11-304

.

As to disqualification of judge in probate matters, see §

2-2-110

.

For duty of judges of district courts to hold court for each other, see §

5-3-106

.

For provision that no change of venue shall be granted in cases arising before police justice under ordinances of cities of the first class, see §

5-6-201

.

As to disqualification of judge in connection with hearings for the establishment of water conservancy districts, see §

41-3-723

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Poston v. District Court, 39 Wyo. 24, 269 P. 35,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(1928); Cosco v. Lampert, 2010 WY 52, 229 P.3d 962,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Apr. 26, 2010).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of nonsuit, dismissal or discontinuance of action on prior order changing venue, 11 ALR2d 1407.

Binding effect of order on motion for change of venue, where action is terminated otherwise than on merits and reinstituted, 85 ALR2d 993.

Prohibition as appropriate remedy to review ruling on change of venue in civil case, 93 ALR2d 802.

§ 1-7-102.
Venue in criminal cases generally.

Every criminal case shall be tried in the county in which the indictment or offense charged is found, except as otherwise provided by law.

When the location of a criminal offense cannot be established with certainty, venue may be placed in the county or district where the corpus delicti is found, or in any county or district in which the victim was transported.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 27, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 3403; R.S. 1899, § 4285; C.S. 1910, § 5146; C.S. 1920, § 6422; R.S. 1931, § 89-1105; C.S. 1945, § 3-1905; W.S. 1957, § 1-58; Laws 1977, ch. 58, § 1; ch. 188, § 1.

Venue of prosecution was properly laid

where there
was conflicting evidence on where the offense occurred, the location
of the offense could not be established with certainty, and therefore
the predicate requirement for considering alternative avenues for
establishing venue was met. Anderson v. State, 2014 WY 74, 327 P.3d 89,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2014).

Generally. —

Venue in criminal cases can be invoked in either the location where the offense is committed or where the corpus delicti is found. Merchant v. State, 4 P.3d 184,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2000).

Venue in county where threatening calls received. —

This section and art. 1, § 10, Wyo. Const., granted venue and jurisdiction in the county where the defendant made phone calls, or where the phone calls were received, because the threats took effect in the county where they were received. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

Change in venue due to pretrial publicity was not warranted.
—

Trial court properly denied defendant's motion for change of venue due to pretrial publicity about defendant's crimes and a separate investigation in which he was a murder suspect because although there were 12 articles published about defendant none was sensational or inflammatory and the last was published three months before trial, and also because only five of 48 prospective jurors expressed concern about their ability to be impartial in light of the pretrial publicity, none of the five was seated on the jury, and the record did not indicate that it was difficult to seat an impartial jury. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

In a murder case, a court properly denied defendant's motion for change of venue where the news articles were generally factual in nature, reporting information obtained from court documents and from a potential witness, and they were not sensational, inflammatory, or prejudicial. Defense counsel and the trial court appropriately and properly examined the jury venire, and there was no indication that the pretrial publicity made jury selection difficult or created such prejudice that a change of venue was necessary. Duke v. State, 2004 WY 120, 99 P.3d 928,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1062, 125 S. Ct. 2513, 161 L. Ed. 2d 1113, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 4397 (U.S. 2005).

In defendant's felony murder case, change of venue was not warranted, where sixty-five jurors were summoned for the trial, and of those, twelve had heard about the case, and each of those jurors was closely examined, and
at the close of voir dire, defendant passed the jury for cause and had no objections to the jury selection process. Lemus v. State, 2007 WY 111, 162 P.3d 497,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2007).

Quoted

in

Smith v. State, 2009 WY 2, 199 P.3d 1052,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Jan. 13, 2009); Poitra v. State, 2012 WY 58, 275 P.3d 478,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Apr. 12, 2012).

Cited

in

Sides v. State, 963 P.2d 227,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1998); Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statutes providing for venue of criminal case in either county, where crime is committed partly in 1 county and partly in another, 30 ALR2d 1265, 73 ALR3d 907.

Venue of criminal charge for child desertion or nonsupport as affected by nonresidence of parent or child, 44 ALR2d 886.

Power or duty of prosecuting attorney to proceed with prosecution after change of venue, 60 ALR2d 864.

Change of venue on ground of disqualification of judge in proceeding to punish contempt against or involving himself or court of which he is a member, 64 ALR2d 600.

Binding effect of order on motion for change of venue, when action is terminated otherwise than on the merits and reinstituted, 85 ALR2d 993.

Venue of criminal prosecution for libel in newspaper, 15 ALR3d 1249.

Pretrial publicity in criminal case as ground for change of venue, 33 ALR3d 17.

Right of accused in misdemeanor prosecution to change of venue on grounds of inability to secure fair trial and the like, 34 ALR3d 804.

Change of venue by state in criminal case, 46 ALR3d 295.

Choice of venue to which transfer is to be had where change is sought because of local prejudice, 50 ALR3d 760.

Power of state trial court in criminal case to change venue on its own motion, 74 ALR4th 1023.